Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2103.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 35-3-4, 35-3-7 and 35-3-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-3
entitled "State Budget" are hereby amended to read as follows:
35-3-4. Estimates submitted by department heads.
(a) On dates determined by the budget officer, but not later than the first day of October in
each year, each head of a department of the state government, not including the general assembly
or the judiciary, shall assemble, correlate, and revise, with power to increase or decrease, the
estimates for expenditures and requests for appropriations for the next ensuing fiscal year of each
of the divisions, boards, commissions, officers, bureaus, institutions, or agencies of the state
included within his or her department, and, after this revision, shall prepare an itemized
departmental estimate of the appropriations necessary to meet the financial needs of the department,
including a statement in detail of all moneys for which any general or special appropriation is
desired at the ensuing session of the general assembly. The estimate shall be in such form, and in
such number of copies, and with such explanation as the budget officer may require, and, on dates
determined by the budget officer, but not later than the first day of October in each year, shall be
submitted to the governor through the budget officer and to the fiscal advisors of the house and
senate.
(b) The estimates shall also include a supplemental presentation of estimates of
expenditures for information resources and information technologies as defined in § 29-8-2
[repealed], regardless of source of financing. The estimate shall include a detailed listing and

explanation of expenses and the source of funds and shall be in such form, and in such number of
copies, and with such explanation as the budget officer may require. Copies shall be provided
directly to the house fiscal advisor, the senate fiscal advisor, and the Rhode Island information
resources management board.
(c) Commencing with the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2027, and in accordance with
the schedule provided in this section, the estimates for expenditures and requests for appropriations
shall be based upon a justification by each department head of the budget of the department from
a zero base. The budget request shall be accompanied by a statement giving facts and explanations
of reasons for each item requested. It shall include a brief explanation of the functions of each of
the divisions, boards, commissions, officers, bureaus, institutions, or agencies of the state included
within the department and comments on its policies and plans, with such descriptive, quantitative,
comparative and other data as to work done and other information as is considered necessary or
desirable. "Zero-based budget" requests, so-called, are requests for appropriations based upon a
justification of a department from a zero base as if the budget for the department was being initiated
for the first time and shall be required based upon the following schedule:
(1) Beginning with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, zero-based budgets shall be
submitted by twenty percent (20%) of state departments, being those departments which submitted
the lowest budget requests for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027;
(2) Beginning with the next fiscal year, zero-based budgets shall be submitted by twenty
percent (20%) of state departments, being those submitting the lowest budget requests for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2028, except for those departments included in subsection (c)(1) of this
section;
(3) Beginning with the next fiscal year, zero-based budget requests shall be submitted by
twenty percent (20%) of state departments submitting the lowest budget requests for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2029, except for those departments included in subsections (c)(1) and (2) of this
section;
(4) Beginning with the next fiscal year, zero-based budget requests shall be submitted by
twenty percent (20%) of state departments submitting the lowest budget requests for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2030, except for those departments included in subsections (c)(1),(2), and (3) of
this section; and
(5) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2031, and thereafter, zero-based budgets shall be
submitted by all remaining state departments.
(d) The budget officer shall provide copies of all submitted zero-based budgets to the house
fiscal advisor and senate fiscal advisor.
LC004059 - Page 2 of 6

35-3-7. Submission of budget to general assembly — Contents.
(a) On or before the third Thursday in January in each year of each January session of the
general assembly, the governor shall submit to the general assembly a budget containing a complete
plan of estimated revenues and proposed expenditures, with a personnel supplement detailing the
number and titles of positions of each agency and the estimates of personnel costs for the next fiscal
year, and with the inventory required by § 35-1.1-3(b)(5). Provided, however, in those years that a
new governor is inaugurated, the new governor shall submit the budget on or before the first
Thursday in February. Beginning with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and in accordance
with the schedule set forth in § 35-3-4, the budget submitted by the governor shall be a partial
"zero-based budget," a budget based upon a justification of each department's estimate of
expenditures and requests for appropriations from a zero base. In accordance with the schedule set
forth in § 35-3-4, the entire budget for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2031, shall be a zero based
budget.
In the budget the governor may set forth in summary and detail:
(1) Estimates of the receipts of the state during the ensuing fiscal year under laws existing
at the time the budget is transmitted and also under the revenue proposals, if any, contained in the
budget, and comparisons with the estimated receipts of the state during the current fiscal year, as
well as actual receipts of the state for the last two (2) completed fiscal years.
(2) Estimates of the expenditures and appropriations necessary in the governor’s judgment
for the support of the state government for the ensuing fiscal year, and comparisons with
appropriations for expenditures during the current fiscal year, as well as actual expenditures of the
state for the last two (2) complete fiscal years; provided, further, in the event the budget submission
includes any transfers of resources from public corporations to the general fund, the budget
submission shall also include alternatives to said transfers.
(3) Financial statements of the:
(i) Condition of the treasury at the end of the last completed fiscal year;
(ii) Estimated condition of the treasury at the end of the current fiscal year; and
(iii) Estimated condition of the treasury at the end of the ensuing fiscal year if the financial
proposals contained in the budget are adopted.
(4) All essential facts regarding the bonded and other indebtedness of the state.
(5) A report indicating those program revenues and expenditures whose funding source is
proposed to be changed from state appropriations to restricted receipts, or from restricted receipts
to other funding sources.
(6) Such other financial statements and data as in the governor’s opinion are necessary or
LC004059 - Page 3 of 6

desirable.
(b) Any other provision of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, the proposed
appropriations submitted by the governor to the general assembly for the next ensuing fiscal year
should not be more than five and one-half percent (5.5%) in excess of total state appropriations,
excluding any estimated supplemental appropriations, enacted by the general assembly for the
fiscal year previous to that for which the proposed appropriations are being submitted; provided
that the increased state-share provisions required to achieve fifty percent (50%) state financing of
local school operations as provided for in P.L. 1985, ch. 182, shall be excluded from the definition
of total appropriations.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall
submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, not later than the
fourth (4th) Thursday in January 2005.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall
submit to the general assembly a supplemental budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006,
and/or a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, not later than Thursday, January 26, 2006.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall
submit to the general assembly a supplemental budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007,
and/or a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, not later than Wednesday, January 31,
2007.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall
submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2012, not later than
Thursday, March 10, 2011.
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall
submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2013, not later than
Tuesday, January 31, 2012.
(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall
submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2016, not later than
Thursday, March 12, 2015.
(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the governor shall
submit to the general assembly a budget for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022, not later than
Thursday, March 11, 2021.
35-3-9. Action on bills by house committee — Hearings.
(a) The budget plan and bill or bills for proposed appropriations, when sent by the governor
to the general assembly, shall be referred as soon as practicable to an appropriate committee of the
LC004059 - Page 4 of 6

house of representatives, and upon receipt of the budget plan the committee shall refer it to a budget
panel consisting of three (3) persons: one of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house;
one of whom shall be appointed by the house minority leader; and one of whom shall be appointed
by the senate president. The members of the panel shall be persons with expertise and experience
in the areas of finance or accounting. The panel shall review the budget plan and shall consider the
objectives, operations, and costs of all activities of each department; explore alternative means of
conducting the activities of each department; evaluate alternative budget amounts for various levels
of effort for each activity of each department. The panel shall report its findings and make its
recommendations as to the needs of each department, the programs and activities of each
department and all other recommendations and information that it deems appropriate, to the
committee, within thirty (30) days after the budget plan is referred to it.
(b) The committee shall proceed to the consideration of the bill upon receipt of this
recommendation of the panel. and the The committee shall forthwith proceed to the consideration
of the bill. The committee shall hear the budget officer upon the bill as a whole or upon any item
thereof or any proposed amendment thereto as each may elect, and the committee may summon the
budget officer to appear before it and to furnish such information relative to the bill or any item
therein, or any proposed amendment thereto, as it may require, and the committee may in its
discretion hear the proper person representing any department or agency desiring to be heard with
respect to any item or amendment in the bill relating to the department or agency; provided, that
nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the right of the committee to hold public
hearings upon the bill as a whole or upon any item therein, or to summon any person for
examination regarding any item contained therein, or for the purpose of obtaining information
necessary for a full and proper consideration of the bill. The committee, after the consideration of
the bill, shall report the bill with its recommendation endorsed thereon to the house of
representatives.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004059
========
LC004059 - Page 5 of 6